Illinois, session 104th, SB3899.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Sports 5Tourism and Regional Strengthening Act. 6    Section 3. Legislative findings and declarations. The 7General Assembly finds and declares that:8        (1) As a result of deteriorating infrastructure and 9    sports facilities in the metropolitan area of Chicago, 10    there is a shortage of facilities suitable for use by 11    professional and other sports teams and musical, 12    theatrical, cultural, and other social organizations. This 13    shortage is a particularly prevalent issue for female 14    sports teams, which often have more economic constraints 15    and have not historically received the same investments as 16    other professional sports franchises.17        (2) The creation of modern sports facilities and the 18    other results contemplated by this Act would stimulate 19    economic activity in the State of Illinois, including the 20    creation and maintenance of jobs, the creation of new and 21    lasting infrastructure and other improvements, and the 22    attraction and retention of sports and entertainment 23    events, which generate economic activity.  SB3899- 2 -LRB104 20600 JDS 34091 b1        (3) Women's professional sports are growing around the 2    world, specifically the National Women's Soccer League 3    (NWSL), which has experienced significant growth in 4    attendance, viewership, and investment in recent years. 5    The popularity of women's sports is evidenced by 6    record-breaking ticket sales, expanded media coverage, and 7    the entry of new sponsors and investors, reflecting a 8    growing public demand and commercial potential. In 2024, 9    the Kansas City Current's $36 million in revenue was the 10    most in the NWSL, more than triple the revenue of 8 other 11    clubs. The gap in revenue is in part because the Current 12    opened the first purpose-built stadium for women's soccer 13    in 2024. Supporting the continued growth of professional 14    women's sports contributes to gender equity, economic 15    development, and increase participation in women's sports 16    at all levels.17        (4) Construction of women's professional sports 18    facilities will create a number of skilled labor and 19    construction jobs with good wages and benefits. Such 20    critical infrastructure will increase the participation of 21    women and minorities in the building trades, promoting 22    diversity, equity, and inclusion in the workforce. 23        (5) Professional sports facilities can be magnets for 24    substantial tourism, resulting in increased retail sales, 25    hotel and restaurant sales, and entertainment industry 26    sales, all of which increase jobs and economic growth.   SB3899- 3 -LRB104 20600 JDS 34091 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.